Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.170

Violations—Investigations.

The director may investigate the actions of a state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser or a state-registered appraiser trainee or an applicant for certification, licensure, or registration or recertification, relicensure, or reregistration. Upon receipt of information indicating that a state-certified or state-licensed real estate appraiser or state-registered appraiser trainee under this chapter may have violated this chapter, the director may cause one or more of the staff investigators to make an investigation of the facts to determine whether or not there is admissible evidence of any such violation. If technical assistance is required, a staff investigator may consult with one or more of the members of the commission.

[ 2005 c 339 s 15; 2002 c 86 s 240; 1996 c 182 s 10; 1993 c 30 s 18; 1989 c 414 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Effective dates—1996 c 182: See note following RCW 18.140.005.